Georgia statutes. 
(4) To acquire, in its own name, by purchase on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper or by gift, grant, lease, or otherwise, real property or rights and easements therein and franchises and personal property necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes, which purposes shall include, but shall not be limited to, the constructing or acquiring of a project, the improving, extending, adding to, reconstructing, renovating, or remodeling of any project or part thereof already constructed or acquired, or demolition to make room for such project or any part thereof, and to insure the same against any and all risks as such insurance may, from time to time, be available; the authority may also use such property, rent or lease the same to or from others, make contracts with respect to the use thereof, or sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or grant options for any such property in any manner which the authority deems to the best advantage of itself and its purposes; provided, however, that the powers to acquire, use, and dispose of property as set forth in this paragraph shall include the power to acquire, use, and dispose of any interest in such property, whether divided or undivided, which acquisition may result in the ownership of such property or any part thereof in common with any other party or parties, public or private; and title to any such property of the authority, however, shall be held by the authority exclusively for the benefit of the public;

(5) To make contracts and leases and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts for construction of projects and leases of projects or contracts with respect to the use of projects which it causes to be acquired or constructed, provided that all private persons, firms, and corporations, this state, and all political subdivisions, departments, instrumentalities, or agencies of the state or of any local government are authorized to enter into contracts, leases, or agreements with the authority upon such terms and for such purposes as they deem advisable; and without limiting the generality of the above, authority is specifically granted to counties and municipal corporations and to the authority to enter into contracts, lease agreements, or other undertakings relative to the furnishing of project activities and facilities or either of them by the authority to such political subdivisions and by such political subdivisions to the authority for a term not exceeding 50 years;

(6) To exercise any one or more of the powers, rights, and privileges conferred by this Code section either alone or jointly or in common with one or more other public or private parties or public and private parties; in any such exercise of such powers, rights, and privileges jointly or in common with others with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of project facilities, the authority may own an undivided interest in such facilities with any other party with which it may jointly or in common exercise the rights and privileges conferred by this chapter; the authority may enter into an agreement or agreements with respect to any such project facility with the other party or parties participating therein; any such agreement may contain such terms, conditions, and provisions, consistent with this chapter, as the parties thereto shall deem to be in their best interests; any such agreement may include, but need not be limited to, provisions for the construction, operation, and maintenance of such project facility by any one or more party of the parties to such agreement, which party or parties shall be designated in or pursuant to such agreement as agent or agents on behalf of itself and one or more of the other parties thereto, or by such other means as may be determined by the parties thereto, and may include provisions for a method or methods of determining and allocating, among or between the parties, costs of construction, operation, maintenance, renewals, replacements, improvements, and disposals with respect to such facility; in carrying out its functions and activities as such agent with respect to construction, operation, and maintenance of such a facility, such agent shall be governed by the laws and regulations applicable to such agent as a separate legal entity and not by any laws or regulations which may be applicable to any of the other participating parties; provided, however, that the agent shall act for the benefit of the public; notwithstanding anything contained in any other law to the contrary, pursuant to the terms of any such agreement, the authority may delegate its powers and duties with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of such facility to the party acting as agent; and all actions taken by such agent in accordance with the provisions of such agreement may be binding upon the authority without further action or approval of the authority;

(7) To extend credit or make loans to any person, firm, corporation, or other industrial entity for the planning, design, construction, acquisition, or carrying out of any project, which credit or loans shall be secured by loan agreements, mortgages, security agreements, contracts, and all other instruments or fees or charges, upon such terms and conditions as the authority shall determine reasonable in connection with such loans, including provision for the establishment and maintenance of reserves and insurance funds, and in the exercise of powers granted by this Code section in connection with a project for such person, firm, corporation, or other industrial entity, to require the inclusion in any contract, loan agreement, security agreement, or other instrument of such provisions for guaranty, insurance, construction, use, operation, maintenance, and financing of a project as the authority may deem necessary or desirable;

(8) To acquire, accept, or retain equitable interests, security interests, or other interest in any property, real or personal, by mortgage, assignment, security agreement, pledge, conveyance, contract, lien, loan agreement, or other consensual transfer in order to secure the repayment of any moneys loaned or credit extended by the authority;

(9) To accept, receive, and administer gifts, grants, appropriations, and donations of money, materials, and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the United States of America, this state, or a unit of local government or any of their agencies, departments, authorities, or instrumentalities upon such terms and conditions as the United States of America, this state, or a unit of local government or any of their agencies, departments, authorities, or instrumentalities shall impose; to administer trusts; and to sell, lease, transfer, convey, appropriate, and pledge any and all of its property and assets;

(10) To invest any accumulation of its funds in any fund or reserve in any manner that public funds of this state or its political subdivisions may be invested;

(11) To do any and all things necessary or proper for the accomplishment of the objectives of this chapter and to exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state, including the power to employ professional and administrative staff and personnel and to retain legal, engineering, fiscal, accounting, and other professional services; the power to purchase all kinds of insurance, including, without limitation, insurance against tort liability and against risks of damage to property; the power to borrow money for any of the corporate purposes of the authority; the power to indemnify and hold harmless any parties contracting with the authority or its agents from damage to persons or property; and the power to act as self-insurer with respect to any loss or liability; provided, however, that obligations of the authority other than revenue bonds, for which provision is made in this chapter, shall be payable from the general funds of the authority and shall not be a charge against any special fund allocated to the payment of revenue bonds;

(12) To mortgage, convey, pledge, or assign any properties, revenues, income, tolls, charges, or fees owned or received by the authority;

(13) To borrow money and issue its revenue bonds and bond anticipation notes from time to time and to use the proceeds thereof for the purpose of paying all or part of the cost of any project, including the cost of extending, adding to, or improving such project, or for the purpose of refunding any such bonds of the authority theretofore issued; and to otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter and to pay all other costs of the authority incident to, or necessary and appropriate to, such purposes, including the providing of funds to be paid into any fund or funds to secure such bonds and notes, provided that all such bonds and notes shall be issued in accordance with the procedures and subject to the limitations set forth in Code Section 36-63-9; provided, however, that the maximum aggregate amount of bonds issued shall be $50 million; and

(14) As security for repayment of authority obligations, to pledge, mortgage, convey, assign, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber any property, real or personal, of such authority and to execute any trust agreement, indenture, or security agreement containing any provisions not in conflict with law, which trust agreement, indenture, or security agreement may provide for foreclosure or forced sale of any property of the authority upon default on such obligations either in payment of principal or interest or in the performance of any term or condition contained in such agreement or indenture; this state, on behalf of itself and each county, municipal corporation, political subdivision, or taxing district therein waives any right which it or such county, municipal corporation, political subdivision, or taxing district may have to prevent the forced sale or foreclosure of any property of the authority so mortgaged or encumbered, and any such mortgage or encumbrance may be foreclosed in accordance with law and the terms thereof.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-7, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 36/SB 465.)

36-75-8. Bonds and notes; expenditure of revenue.

Statute text

(a) Subject to the limitations and procedures provided by this Code section, the obligations of any authority evidenced by bonds, bond anticipation notes, trust indentures, deeds to secure obligations, security agreements, or mortgages executed in connection therewith may contain such provisions not inconsistent with law as shall be determined by the board of directors of the authority. The authority, in such instruments, may provide for the pledging of all or any part of its revenues, income, or charges and for the mortgaging, encumbering, or conveying of all or any part of its real or personal property; may covenant against pledging any or all of its revenues, income, or charges; and may further provide for the disposition of proceeds realized from the sale of any bonds and bond anticipation notes, for the replacement of lost, destroyed, stolen, or mutilated bonds and notes, and for the payment and redemption of such bonds and notes. Similarly, subject to the limitations and procedures of this Code section, undertakings of an authority may prescribe the procedure by which bondholders and noteholders may enforce rights against the authority and provide for rights upon breach of any covenant, condition, or obligation of the authority. Bonds, resolutions, trust indentures, mortgages, or deeds to secure obligations executed by an authority and bond anticipation notes executed by an authority may contain such provisions not otherwise contrary to law as the authority shall deem necessary or desirable.

(b) The proceeds derived from the sale of all bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority shall be held and used for the ultimate purpose of paying, directly or indirectly as permitted in this chapter, all or part of the cost of any project, including the cost of extending, financing, adding to, or improving such project, or for the purpose of refunding any bond anticipation notes issued in accordance with this chapter or refunding any previously issued bonds of the authority.

(c) All bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority shall be revenue obligations of such authority and may be made payable out of any revenues or other receipts, funds, or moneys of the authority, subject only to any agreements with the holders of other bonds or bond anticipation notes or to particular security agreements pledging any particular revenues, receipts, funds, or moneys.

(d) Issuance by an authority of one or more series of bonds or bond anticipation notes for one or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds or notes in connection with the same project or with any other projects, but the proceeding wherein any subsequent bonds or bond anticipation notes shall be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made in any prior security agreement or made for any prior issue of bonds or bond anticipation notes, unless in the resolution authorizing such prior issue the right is expressly reserved to the authority to issue subsequent bonds or bond anticipation notes on a parity with such prior issue.

(e) An authority shall have the power and is authorized, whenever revenue bonds of the authority have been validated as provided in this chapter, to issue, from time to time, its notes in anticipation of the issuance of such bonds as validated and to renew from time to time any such notes by the issuance of new notes, whether the notes to be renewed have or have not matured. The authority may issue notes only to provide funds which would otherwise be provided by the issuance of the bonds as validated. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds. As with its bonds, the authority may sell such notes at public or private sale. Any resolution or resolutions authorizing notes of the authority or any issue thereof may contain any provisions which the authority is authorized to include in any such resolution or resolutions; and the authority may include in any notes any terms, covenants, or conditions which it is authorized to include in any bonds. Validation of such bonds shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of the notes, but it shall not be required that such notes be judicially validated. Bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in an amount exceeding the par value of the bonds in anticipation of which they are to be issued.

(f) The interest rate on or rates to be borne by any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the authority shall be fixed by the board of directors of the authority. Any limitations with respect to interest rates found in Article 3 of Chapter 82 of this title or in the usury laws of this state shall not apply to obligations issued under this chapter.

(g) All revenue bonds issued by an authority under this chapter shall be issued and validated under and in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 82 of this title, except as provided in subsection (f) of this Code section and except as specifically set forth below in this subsection:

(1) Revenue bonds issued by an authority may be in such form, either coupon or fully registered, or both coupon and fully registered, and may be subject to such exchangeability and transferability provisions as the bond resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or any indenture or trust agreement may provide;

(2) Revenue bonds shall bear a certificate of validation. The signature of the clerk of the superior court of the judicial circuit in which the issuing authority is located may be made on the certificate of validation of such bonds by facsimile or by manual execution, stating the date on which such bonds were validated; and such entry shall be original evidence of the fact of judgment and shall be received as original evidence in any court in this state; and

(3) In lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which revenue bonds to be issued by an authority are to bear, the notice to the district attorney or the Attorney General and the notice to the public of the time, place, and date of the validation hearing may state that the bonds, when issued, will bear interest at a rate not exceeding a maximum per annum rate of interest specified in such notices or, in the event the bonds are to bear different rates of interest for different maturity dates, that none of such rates will exceed the maximum rate specified in the notices; provided, however, that nothing contained in this paragraph shall be construed as prohibiting or restricting the right of the authority to sell such bonds at a discount, even if in so doing the effective interest cost resulting therefrom would exceed the maximum per annum interest rate specified in such notices.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-8, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, § 1.)

36-75-9. Responsibility for bonds and obligations.

Statute text

No bonds or other obligations of and no indebtedness incurred by any authority shall constitute an indebtedness or obligation of the State of Georgia or of any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof, nor shall any act of any authority in any manner constitute or result in the creation of an indebtedness of this state or of any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision. All such bonds and obligations shall be payable solely from the revenues therein pledged to such payment, including pledged rentals, sales proceeds, insurance proceeds, and condemnation awards; and no holder or holders of any such bonds or obligations shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of this state or of any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof, nor to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state or of any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-9, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, § 1.)

36-75-10. Construction.

Statute text

This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof. Sale or issuance of bonds by any authority shall not be subject to regulation under Chapter 5 of Title 10, the "Georgia Uniform Securities Act of 2008," or any other law. No proceeding or publication not required in this chapter shall be necessary to the performance of any act authorized in this chapter, nor shall any such act be subject to referendum.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-10, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 381, § 11/SB 358.)

36-75-11. Resolutions and referendums required prior to issuance of bonded indebtedness for new projects; exclusions.

Statute text

(a) On and after May 24, 2007, no public safety and judicial facilities authority created and activated by a single county pursuant to this chapter shall be authorized to issue bonds for new projects unless a resolution approving such projects passed by a majority vote of the governing authority of the county that created and activated such authority was ratified by the electors of the county in a referendum.

(b) The proceeds of bonds issued by a public safety and judicial facilities authority created and activated by a single county pursuant to this chapter and any interest on such proceeds shall be used only for the projects set forth in the resolution approving the issuance of such bonds or for debt service on such bonds.

(c) Any authority other than the type of authority defined in paragraph (1) of Code Section 36-75-3:

(1) Which is authorized by general or local Act to operate and issue bonds in a single county that has activated or that activates a public safety and judicial facilities authority pursuant to this chapter; and

(2) Which constructs or operates buildings or facilities for use by any department, agency, division, or commission of any county that has activated or that activates a public safety and judicial facilities authority pursuant to this chapter

shall obtain approval by resolution and referendum as provided in this Code section prior to issuing bonds for any new buildings, facilities, or real property or improvements to existing buildings, facilities, or real property and shall be bound to such resolution as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

(d) Subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this Code section shall apply only to the issuance of bonds the principal and interest of which will be repaid, directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, through funds of the county by agreement between the county and:

(1) A public safety and judicial facilities authority created and activated pursuant to this chapter; or

(2) Any authority other than the type of authority defined in paragraph (1) of Code Section 36-75-3 that meets the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section.

(e) The provisions of this Code section shall not apply under any circumstances to the issuance of "recovery zone economic development bonds" and "recovery zone facility bonds" as such terms are defined in Section 1401 of the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-11, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 421, § 1/HB 181; Ga. L. 2010, p. 4, § 2/HB 203.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, "May 24, 2007" was substituted for "the effective date of this Code section" in subsection (a).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - War on Terrorism Local Assistance Act, O.C.G.A. § 36-75-1 et seq., is not unconstitutional because the Act does not violate the uniform terms and conditions provision for development authorities in Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. III; the uniformity required by Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. III in the laws creating development authorities is the same uniformity required by Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV(a) in laws of a general nature. Dev. Auth. v. State, 286 Ga. 36, 684 S.E.2d 856 (2009).

Classification is not unreasonable or arbitrary and is therefore constitutional. - War on Terrorism Local Assistance Act, specifically O.C.G.A. § 36-75-11(c), is not unconstitutional because the classification in § 36-75-11 is not unreasonable and arbitrary since the classification applies in precisely the same way and without exception to every county development authority throughout the state that currently meets or may, in the future, meet the criteria set forth in § 36-75-11(c); the purpose of § 36-75-11 is to protect against the accumulation of excessive bonded indebtedness, and the legislature had a reasonable basis to first address this critical financial situation in counties. Dev. Auth. v. State, 286 Ga. 36, 684 S.E.2d 856 (2009).

Legislation enacting the War on Terrorism Local Assistance Act, Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, does not violate Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV because the legislation and O.C.G.A. § 36-75-11(c) are logically related and do not embrace discordant subjects when the legislation generally pertains to public safety and judicial facilities authorities, and § 36-75-11(c) applies to authorities in counties that have activated public safety and judicial facilities authorities; it was the legislature's decision to enact a statute imposing a referendum requirement on any authority that has been authorized to incur bonded indebtedness in a county with an activated public safety and judicial facilities authority when that authority has constructed or operates buildings or facilities for use by a department, agency, division, or commission of such county. Dev. Auth. v. State, 286 Ga. 36, 684 S.E.2d 856 (2009).

36-75-12. Authorities with maximum amount of outstanding bonded indebtedness to obtain approval by resolution and referendum prior to issuing additional bonds.

Statute text

Those public safety and judicial facilities authorities created and activated pursuant to this chapter that have issued the $50 million maximum aggregate amount of bonds permitted under paragraph (13) of Code Section 36-75-7 shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 36-75-11 when such bonded indebtedness is reduced and such authorities desire to issue additional bonds for new projects.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-12, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 421, § 1/HB 181.)

36-75-13. Jurisdictions with activated public safety and judicial facilities authorities prohibited from also activating joint public safety and judicial facilities authority.

Statute text

On and after May 24, 2007, no county or municipality that has activated or that activates a public safety and judicial facilities authority shall also activate a joint public safety and judicial facilities authority.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-13, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 421, § 1/HB 181.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, "May 24, 2007" was substituted for "the effective date of this Code section".

——————————

CHAPTER 76

EXPEDITED FRANCHISING OF CABLE AND VIDEO SERVICES

Sec.

36-76-1. Short title.

36-76-2. Definitions.

36-76-3. Franchise options for cable service and video service providers.

36-76-4. Application process for the issuance of a state franchise; fees.

36-76-5. Transfers, modifications, and terminations of a state franchise.

36-76-6. Franchise fees.

36-76-7. Customer service requirements.

36-76-8. Public, educational, and governmental programming under a state franchise.

36-76-9. Service outlet to municipalities and counties; complimentary basic cable service or video service to public schools and public libraries.

36-76-10. Limitations on requirements that may be imposed upon holders of a state franchise.

36-76-11. Discrimination towards potential residential subscribers prohibited.

Annotations

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Cable and video service complaints, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Title 93.

Law reviews. - For note on 2007 enactment of this chapter, see 24 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 223 (2007).

36-76-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Consumer Choice for Television Act."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-76-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 719, § 1/HB 227.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

36-76-2. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Advertising and home shopping services revenues" means the amount of a cable service provider or video service provider's nonsubscriber revenues from advertising disseminated through cable service or video service and home shopping services. The amount of such revenues that are allocable to a municipality or county shall be equal to the total amount of the cable service provider or video service provider's revenue received from such advertising and home shopping services multiplied by the ratio of the number of such provider's subscribers located in such municipality or in the unincorporated area of such county to the total number of such provider's subscribers. Such ratio shall be based on the number of such provider's subscribers as of January 1 of the current year, except that in the first year in which services are provided, such ratio shall be computed as of the earliest practical date.

(2) "Affected local governing authority" means any municipal governing authority when any part of such municipality is located within the service area and any county governing authority when any part of the unincorporated area of such county is located within the service area.

(3) "Cable service" means the one-way transmission to subscribers of video programming or other programming service and subscriber interaction, if any, which is required for the selection or use of such video programming or other programming service. Cable service shall not include any video programming provided by a provider of commercial mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 332(d) or video programming provided as part of and via a service that enable users to access content, information, e-mail, or other services offered over the public Internet.

(4) "Cable service provider" means any person or group of persons:

(A) Who provides cable service over a cable system and directly or through one or more affiliates owns a significant interest in such cable system; or

(B) Who otherwise controls or is responsible for, through any arrangement, the management and operation of such a cable system.

(5) "Cable system" means a facility consisting of a set of closed transmission paths and associated signal generation, reception, and control equipment that is designed to provide cable service which includes video programming and which is provided to multiple subscribers within a community, but such term shall not include:

(A) A facility that serves only to retransmit the television signals of one or more television broadcast stations;

(B) A facility that serves subscribers without using any public right of way as defined in this Code section;

(C) A facility of a common carrier which is subject, in whole or in part, to the provisions of 47 U.S.C. Sections 201 through 276, except that such facility shall be considered a cable system, other than for purposes of 47 U.S.C. Section 541(c), to the extent such facility is used in the transmission of video programming directly to subscribers, unless the extent of such use is solely to provide interactive on-demand services as that term is defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 522(12);

(D) An open video system that complies with 47 U.S.C. Section 573; or

(E) Any facility of any electric utility used solely for operating such electric utility system.

(6) "Franchise" means an initial authorization or renewal of an authorization issued by a franchise authority, regardless of whether the authorization is designated as a franchise, permit, license, resolution, contract, ordinance, certificate, agreement, or otherwise, that authorizes the construction or operation of a cable service provider or video service provider's network in the public rights of way.

(7) "Franchise authority" means any governmental entity empowered by federal, state, or local law to grant a franchise. With regard to the holder of a state franchise within the service areas covered by such state franchise, the Secretary of State shall be the sole franchising authority. With respect to a franchise agreement with a municipal or county governing authority, that municipality or county shall be the sole franchising authority within the service areas covered by that local franchise.

(8) "Gross revenues" means all revenues received from subscribers for the provision of cable service or video service, including franchise fees for cable service providers and video service providers, and advertising and home shopping services revenues and shall be determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Gross revenues shall not include:

(A) Amounts billed and collected as a line item on the subscriber's bill to recover any taxes, surcharges, or governmental fees that are imposed on or with respect to the services provided or measured by the charges, receipts, or payments therefor; provided, however, that for purposes of this Code section, such tax, surcharge, or governmental fee shall not include any ad valorem taxes, net income taxes, or generally applicable business or occupation taxes not measured exclusively as a percentage of the charges, receipts, or payments for services;

(B) Any revenue, such as bad debt, not actually received, even if billed;

(C) Any revenue received by any affiliate or any other person in exchange for supplying goods or services used by the provider to provide cable service or video programming;

(D) Any amounts attributable to refunds, rebates, or discounts;

(E) Any revenue from services provided over the network that are associated with or classified as noncable or nonvideo services under federal law, including, without limitation, revenues received from telecommunications services, information services other than cable service or video service, Internet access services, or directory or Internet advertising revenue, including, without limitation, yellow pages, white pages, banner advertisements, and electronic publishing advertising. Where the sale of any such noncable or nonvideo service is bundled with the sale of one or more cable services or video services and sold for a single nonitemized price, the term "gross revenues" shall include only those revenues that are attributable to cable service or video service based on the provider's books and records; such revenues shall be allocated in a manner consistent with generally accepted accounting principles;

(F) Any revenue from late fees not initially booked as revenues, returned check fees, or interest;

(G) Any revenue from sales or rental of property, except such property as the subscriber shall be required to buy or rent exclusively from the cable service provider or video service provider to receive cable service or video service;

(H) Any revenue received from providing or maintaining inside wiring;

(I) Any revenue from sales for resale with respect to which the purchaser shall be required to pay a franchise fee, provided the purchaser certifies in writing that it shall resell the service and pay a franchise fee with respect thereto; or

(J) Any amounts attributable to a reimbursement of costs including, but not limited to, the reimbursements by programmers of marketing costs incurred for the promotion or introduction of video programming.

(9) "Incumbent service provider" means any cable service provider or video service provider providing cable service or video service, respectively, in a municipality or in an unincorporated area of a county on January 1, 2008.

(10) "Original programming" means programming produced specifically for or about a municipality or county or citizens thereof and shall include public government meetings. Original programming shall not include character generated messages, video bulletin board messages, traffic cameras, or other passively produced content.

(11) "PEG" means public, educational, or governmental.

(12) "Public right of way" means the area in, on, along, over, or under the public roads that are part of the municipal or county road system or the state highway system.

(13) "Service area" means the geographic territory within a municipality or unincorporated area of a county where a cable service provider or video service provider provides or has proposed to offer cable service or video service pursuant to a franchise.

(14) "Subscriber" means any person or entity lawfully receiving video service from a video service provider or cable service from a cable service provider.

(15) "Video programming" means programming provided by, or generally considered comparable to programming provided by, a television broadcast station, as set forth in 47 U.S.C. Section 522(20).

(16) "Video service" means the provision of video programming through wireline facilities located at least in part in the public rights of way without regard to delivery technology, including Internet protocol technology. This term shall not include any video programming provided by a provider of commercial mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 332(d) or video programming provided as part of and via a service that enables users to access content, information, e-mail, or other services offered over the public Internet.

(17) "Video service provider" means an entity providing video service as defined in this Code section. This term shall not include a cable service provider.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-76-2, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 719, § 1/HB 227.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Revenue and Taxation: Amend Titles 48, 2, 28, 33, 36, 46, and 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, Relating Respectively to Revenue and Taxation, Agriculture, the General Assembly, Insurance, Local Government, Public Utilities, and State Government," see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 217 (2011).

36-76-3. Franchise options for cable service and video service providers.

Statute text

(a) (1) Any entity or person seeking to provide cable service or video service in this state after January 1, 2008, at the discretion of the cable service provider or video service provider, may elect from among the franchise options as set forth in this Code section. A cable service provider or video service provider shall not provide cable service or video service without a franchise obtained pursuant to this chapter.

(2) A cable service provider or video service provider may elect to negotiate a local cable service or video service franchise agreement with a municipal or county franchise authority duly authorized under the laws of Georgia and may enter into a negotiated cable television franchise agreement in accordance with Title VI of the Communications Act of 1934, as amended, 47 U.S.C. Section 521 et seq., or a video service franchise agreement in accordance with applicable state and federal law that establishes the terms and conditions for the franchise agreement within the jurisdictional limits of that municipality or county. A local cable service or video service franchise agreement entered into after January 1, 2008, shall remain in force and effect through its expiration date notwithstanding subsection (g) of Code Section 36-76-4.

(3) A cable service provider or video service provider may elect to adopt the terms of a negotiated franchise agreement entered into between a cable service provider or video service provider and a municipal or county franchise authority in the service area in which the cable service provider or video service provider desires to provide service. The municipal or county franchise authority shall be required to enter into any such negotiated franchise agreement upon the same terms and conditions to any requesting cable service provider or video service provider. A local cable service or video service franchise agreement that is adopted by a cable service provider or video service provider after January 1, 2008, shall remain in force and effect through its expiration date notwithstanding subsection (g) of Code Section 36-76-4.

(4) A cable service provider or video service provider may elect after January 1, 2008, to file an application for a state franchise in one or more specified service areas with the Secretary of State in accordance with the procedures set forth in this chapter.

(b) The alternatives in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be mutually exclusive. A cable service provider or video service provider may elect after January 1, 2008, to negotiate with a municipal or county franchise authority to enter into a franchise agreement within a specified service area and may also obtain a state franchise for a different service area. A cable service provider or video service provider shall not operate under a franchise agreement with a municipal or county governing authority and a state franchise from the Secretary of State for the same service area.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-76-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 719, § 1/HB 227.)

36-76-4. Application process for the issuance of a state franchise; fees.

Statute text
